Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Annual Supplement, 201521-20,177
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298; Laws 2015, LB157, § 10; Laws 2015, LB294, § 25. Operative date January 1, 2017. Foreign corporation; service; consent to service of search warrant or subpoena.

(1) The registered agent of a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state shall be the corporation's agent for service of process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served on the foreign corporation. By being authorized to transact business in this state, the foreign corporation's agent for service of process shall also consent to service of process directed to the foreign corporation's agent in Nebraska for a search warrant issued pursuant to sections 29-812 to 29-821, or for any other validly issued and properly served court order or subpoena, including those authorized under sections 86-2,106 and 86-2,112, for records or documents that are in the possession of the foreign corporation and are located inside or outside of this state. The consent to service of a court order, subpoena, or search warrant applies to a foreign corporation that is a party or nonparty to the matter for which the court order, subpoena, or search warrant is sought.

(2) A foreign corporation may be served by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, addressed to the secretary of the foreign corporation or the designated custodian of records at its principal office shown in its application for a certificate of authority or in its most recent annual report if the foreign corporation has:

(a) No registered agent or its registered agent cannot with reasonable diligence be served;

(b) Withdrawn from transacting business in this state under section 21-20,178; or

(c) Had its certificate of authority revoked under section 21-20,180.

(3) Service shall be perfected under subsection (2) of this section at the earliest of:

(a) The date the foreign corporation receives the mail;

(b) The date shown on the return receipt if signed on behalf of the foreign corporation; or

(c) Five days after its deposit in the United States mail as evidenced by the postmark if mailed postage prepaid and correctly addressed.

(4) This section shall not be construed to prescribe the only means or necessarily the required means of serving a foreign corporation.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 177;

Laws 2009, LB97, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB294, § 7.
May 20, 2015